Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-322.01
Administrative fine; disposition; collection.

(1) All money collected by the department as an administrative fine shall be transmitted on a monthly basis to the State Treasurer who shall deposit such money in the permanent school fund.

(2) Any administrative fine levied under section 9-322 and unpaid shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected by lien foreclosure, or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action, in the name of the State of Nebraska, in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 71.